Washington statutes.
RCW 43.05.902

Resolution of conflict with federal requirements—Notification.

If notified by responsible federal officials of any conflict of this chapter with federal law or program requirements or with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state, the regulatory agency notified of the conflict shall actively seek to resolve the conflict. If the agency determines that the conflict cannot be resolved without loss of benefits or authority to the state, the agency shall notify the governor, the president of the senate, and the speaker of the house of representatives in writing within thirty days of making that determination.

[ 1995 c 403 s 620.]